Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Federal Maternity Benefits

§§ 35-4-401 through 35-4-403.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 84, §
104.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1923, ch. 32, §§ 1 and 2, related to federal maternity benefits.

Laws 2012, ch. 84, § 401, makes the act effective July 1, 2012.